Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1339
Applicability.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, the Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act applies to a foreign-country judgment to the extent that the judgment:

(1) grants or denies recovery of a sum of money; and

(2) under the law of the foreign country where rendered, is final, conclusive, and enforceable.

(b) The Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act does not apply to a foreign-country judgment, even if the judgment grants or denies recovery of a sum of money, to the extent that the judgment is:

(1) a judgment for taxes;

(2) a fine or other penalty; or

(3) a judgment for divorce, support, or maintenance, or other judgment rendered in connection with domestic relations.

(c) A party seeking recognition of a foreign-country judgment has the burden of establishing that the Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act applies to the foreign-country judgment.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 3.